Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 2. Permits for Construction of Wells

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-3-930.
Application; who required to file; filing; contents; use of water from existing well; statement of claim.

Any person who intends to acquire the right to beneficial use of any underground water in the state of Wyoming, shall, before commencing construction of any well or other means of obtaining underground water or performing any work in connection with construction or proposed appropriation of underground water or any manner utilizing the water for beneficial purposes, file with the state engineer an application for a permit to make the appropriation and shall not proceed with any construction or work until a permit is granted by the state engineer, provided, that whenever a bore hole constructed for mineral exploration, oil and gas exploration, stratigraphic information or any other purpose not related to groundwater development shall be found to be suitable for the withdrawal of underground water, application shall be filed with and approved by the state engineer before water from the bore hole is beneficially utilized. The state engineer may authorize the construction and use of multiple wells for industrial purposes for in situ mining, dewatering or use for pollution control or remediation with a single permit if the groundwater to be developed by the proposed appropriation is to be used for a specific purpose within the department of environmental quality permitted boundary and served from a single source of supply. The application shall contain the name and post-office address of applicant or applicants, a detailed description of the proposed use, the location by legal subdivision of the proposed well or other means of obtaining underground water, the estimated depth of the proposed well, the quantity of water proposed to be withdrawn and beneficially utilized in gallons per minute and acre-feet per calendar year, the location by legal subdivision of the area or point of use shall be provided, and such other information as the state engineer may require.

In addition to providing the information required in subsection (a) of this section, applications for permits to appropriate groundwater, geothermal or otherwise, located within fifteen (15) miles of the boundary of Yellowstone National Park shall be accompanied by a written report prepared by a qualified professional and containing such geologic, hydrologic and other information necessary to show that the proposed development will not impair or produce an injurious effect on the hydrothermal system or hydrothermal features located within the boundaries of Yellowstone National Park. The state engineer shall consider all the information provided by the applicant and any other information available to him or necessary to make an informed decision before acting on the application. If upon review of the submitted information or other records available to him, the state engineer determines that the applicant has not shown that the proposed development will not impair or produce an injurious effect upon the hydrothermal features located within the boundaries of Yellowstone National Park, the state engineer shall deny the application for permit. Wells for domestic and stock purposes as defined in W.S.

41-3-907

will be exempt from the requirements of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to interfere with the right of any person to use water from any existing well constructed prior to May 24, 1969 where the water is economically and beneficially used for stock or domestic use as provided by W.S.

41-3-907

, and the uses from the well are hereby declared to constitute a vested right, provided, that the owner of the water right must have registered the right prior to December 31, 1972. If the water right was not registered prior to December 31, 1972 an application shall be filed in accordance with the provisions of this section to obtain a water right and the applicant shall receive, as the water right priority date, the date the application is received by the state engineer.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 41-138; Laws 1969, ch. 213, § 6; 1991, ch. 226, § 1; 1995, ch. 206, § 1; 2014 ch. 24, § 1, effective March 4, 2014.

The 2014 amendment

, added the present second sentence in (a).

Laws 2014, ch. 24, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2014.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For comment, “The Idaho and Montana Procedures for Obtaining Water Use Permits — Possible Sources for Improvement of Wyoming Law,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1975).

For article, “The Challenge of Mine Dewatering to Western Water Law and the New Mexico Response,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 445 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Well drilling under contract, 90 ALR2d 1346.

§ 41-3-931.
Application; when granted generally; denial subject to review; defects and corrections generally; cancellation.

An application for a permit for a well in any areas not designated as a critical area shall be granted as a matter of course, if the proposed use is beneficial and, if the state engineer finds that the proposed means of diversion and construction are adequate. If the state engineer finds that to grant the application as a matter of course, would not be in public’s water interest, then he may deny the application subject to review at the next meeting of the state board of control. If the state engineer shall find that the proposed means of diversion or construction are inadequate, or if the application is otherwise defective, he may return the application for correction. If such correction is not made within ninety (90) days, the state engineer may cancel the application.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 41-139; Laws 1969, ch. 100, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Determining Quantity in Irrigation Appropriations,” see IV Land & Water L. Rev. 501 (1969).

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For article, “The Challenge of Mine Dewatering to Western Water Law and the New Mexico Response,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 445 (1980).

§ 41-3-932.
Public notice of application or petition; hearing before state engineer and control area advisory board; cost.

Upon the filing of a petition to amend an existing water right or an application to appropriate underground water for any use other than domestic, stockwatering or miscellaneous purposes where the quantity of water to be appropriated is twenty-five (25) gallons of water per minute or less, from an area designated as a control area by the state board of control, the state engineer shall cause to be published, at applicant’s expense, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county wherein the proposed well or requested change will be located, for at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks, a notice of the filing of the application or requested changes and that objections to the granting thereof may be filed within ten (10) days after the last publication of the notice, on the grounds that there is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of supply or that the granting of the application would be detrimental to the public interest. If objections are filed within the time specified in the notice, the state engineer shall set a date for a hearing on the application or requested changes and the objections thereto and shall notify the applicant or petitioner and the objectors thereof. If the applicant or petitioner questions the standing of the objector, the state engineer shall make written findings of fact on the issue and may overrule the objection on that basis. The hearing shall be before the control area advisory board and the state engineer, and shall be held in an appropriate place within the county in which the proposed well or requested change is to be located. The state engineer, for good cause, may impose costs of the hearing proportionally upon the applicant or petitioner and the objectors. The hearing under this subsection shall be a contested case hearing conducted in conformance with and subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. A decision by the state engineer granting or denying an application or petition under this subsection may be appealed to the board of control within thirty (30) days of the date of receipt of notice of the decision. Upon appeal and based on the contested case record and upon additional evidence, if any, taken at the direction of the board, the board may affirm, modify or reverse the findings of the state engineer. An appeal from an order of the board of control may be taken to the district court pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

If no objections are filed against the application or petition under subsection (a) of this section but the state engineer is of the opinion that the application or petition may be detrimental to the public interest, or desires to obtain the recommendations of the control area advisory board, he shall set a date for a public hearing on the application or petition and shall notify the applicant or petitioner of the time and place thereof. Not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing the state engineer shall cause notice of the hearing to be published, at the expense of the applicant or petitioner, in at least one (1) newspaper having general circulation in the county in which the proposed well or requested change is to be located. The state engineer shall notify the applicant or petitioner of the time and place of the hearing. The public hearing shall be held before the control area advisory board and the state engineer in an appropriate place in the county in which the proposed well or requested change is to be located. In making any determination required by this section, the state engineer may rely upon records and information on file in his office or in the office of the board of control. In the event a hearing is held he shall make known the records and information upon which he relies at least fifteen (15) days before the hearing. A decision by the state engineer under this subsection may be appealed by the applicant or petitioner to the board of control within thirty (30) days of the date of receipt of notice of the decision. Upon appeal the board of control shall conduct a contested case hearing in accordance with its rules and regulations and the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. An appeal from an order of the board of control may be taken to the district court pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The application or petition shall be granted and the permit issued only if the state engineer finds, after receiving the advice of the control area advisory board, that there are unappropriated waters in the proposed source, that the proposed means of diversion or construction is adequate, that the location of the proposed well or other work does not conflict with any well spacing or well distribution regulation and that the proposed use would not be detrimental to the public interest. In any contested case hearing conducted under this section, the applicant or petitioner shall bear the burden of proof. If the state engineer finds that the application or petition is incomplete or otherwise defective, he shall return the application or petition for correction. If the correction is not made within ninety (90) days, the application or petition shall be rejected.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 90, § 2.

A petition to amend an existing water right which originated with the board of control may be subject to additional action by the board of control. Any petition to amend an existing water right granted by the state engineer pursuant to this section, if that decision is not appealed, shall be returned to the board of control for any additional action that may be required by law.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 41-140; Laws 1969, ch. 100, § 2; 1973, ch. 171, § 2; 1984, ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 179, § 1; 2014 ch. 90, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2022 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the fourth sentence of (a), deleted “or state board of control”; added the fifth through ninth sentences; in the first sentence of (b), inserted “under subsection (a) of this section,” inserted “public”; added the present second and third sentences; in the fourth sentence, inserted “public,” deleted “shall be open to the public, and”; in the fifth sentence, added “of control” at the end; in the sixth sentence, deleted “to the parties,” and added “at least fifteen (15) days before the hearing” to the end; deleted the former seventh sentence which read: “The state engineer, for good cause, may impose costs of the hearing proportionally upon the applicant or petitioner and the objecters”; added the the present seventh through ninth sentences; and added (e).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (c), added the second sentence and made a stylistic change.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

§ 41-3-933.
Express conditions limiting rights of appropriator; additional conditions.

It is an express condition of each underground water permit that the right of the appropriator does not include the right to have the water level or artesian pressure at the appropriator’s point of diversion maintained at any level or pressure higher than that required for maximum beneficial use of the water in the source of supply. The state engineer may issue any permits subject to such conditions as he may find to be in the public interest.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 41-141; Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 2.

§ 41-3-934.
Time limits to complete construction; extensions; cancellation generally.

If the permit is granted, the applicant shall complete the construction and apply the water to beneficial use before the date specified in the conditions of approval, which shall not be more than three (3) years after the date of approval. The state engineer may extend the period or cancel the permit in accordance with the procedures set forth in W.S.

41-4-506

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 41-142; Laws 1959, ch. 22, § 1; 1973, ch. 171, § 2; 1995, ch. 102, § 1.

§ 41-3-935.
Adjudication procedure.

Any person constructing any well under a permit shall, within thirty (30) days after the completion or abandonment of such work, report to the state engineer the data required relating to such well, on forms furnished by the state engineer. A well shall be considered complete when it is possible to install a pump and pump water. In the case of an artesian well, completion is the time when the drill rig is moved off of the drilling site.

Adjudication of all ground water rights except stock watering and domestic uses of ground water referenced in W.S.

41-3-907

shall proceed upon completion of the work according to the terms of the permit and the recording on forms furnished by the state engineer of such information as is deemed necessary concerning the works, and the filing of a map signed by a Wyoming licensed professional engineer or land surveyor, showing the location of the well and the point or points of use. The state engineer or his authorized representative shall inspect the works, the lands irrigated or other uses being made of the water upon receipt of the map. The adjudication of stock watering and domestic uses of ground water referenced in W.S.

41-3-907

may be initiated by the state engineer or the appropriator of record and will not require the filing of a map signed by a Wyoming licensed professional engineer or land surveyor, showing the location of the well and the points and areas of use or require the inspection by the state engineer or his authorized representative of the works, the lands irrigated or other uses being made of the water unless, in the discretion of the state engineer, such procedures are deemed necessary and appropriate. At this time the board may consider for adjudication the ground water rights upon proof of beneficial use being submitted by the appropriator.

Adjudication shall proceed in the same manner prescribed for the adjudication of surface water appropriations once the state engineer or his authorized representative has reported his findings to the board. A ground water appropriation attaches to the land for irrigation, or for such other purposes or object for which it was acquired.

In the interest of an orderly adjudication procedure for ground water, the state engineer, with the concurrence of the board, may order adjudication of any ground water appropriations in the state. Upon one (1) year notice, any appropriator whose appropriation is to be adjudicated shall furnish the state engineer all of the documents mentioned in subsection (b) of this section. If any appropriator refuses to supply any of this information, the superintendent may tag and lock the well. Any appropriator that interferes with the tag or lock is subject to the same penalty as provided in W.S.

41-3-938

. Use of water well so tagged or locked is prima facie evidence of such interference.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 41-143; Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 2; 1992, ch. 43, § 6.

§ 41-3-936.
Priority of appropriation.

The priority of appropriation of underground water obtained prior to April 1, 1947, shall date from time of completion of the well. The priority of appropriation of underground water obtained subsequent to April 1, 1947, and prior to March 1, 1958, shall date from the filing of registration in the state engineer’s office. The priority of appropriation of underground water obtained on or subsequent to March 1, 1958, shall date from the filing of the application for permit in the state engineer’s office. Priority of appropriation of underground water for stock or domestic purposes, as defined in W.S.

41-3-907

, shall date from the time of completion of the well if properly registered with the state engineer prior to December 31, 1972. If registered with the state engineer subsequent to December 31, 1972, the priority shall date from the filing or registration in the state engineer’s office.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 41-144; Laws 1969, ch. 213, § 7.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

§ 41-3-937.
Cancellation or suspension of permits or certificates.

Whenever, after notice to and opportunity to be heard, the state engineer finds that the holder of any permit is willfully violating or has willfully violated any provision of such permit or any provision of this act or of any order issued pursuant to this act, the state engineer may cancel or suspend such permit or impose conditions on the future use thereof to prevent such violation, pursuant to W.S. 41-3-616(c). Whenever, after notice to and opportunity to be heard, the board of control finds that the holder of any certificate of registration or certificate of appropriation is willfully violating or has willfully violated any provision of such certificate or any provision of this act or of any order issued pursuant to this act, the board of control may cancel or suspend such certificate or impose conditions on the future use thereof to prevent such violation, pursuant to W.S. 41-3-616(d).

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 41-146; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, twice added provisions that conditions could be imposed as provided by §

41-3-616

for specified violations; and made stylistic changes.

§ 41-3-938.
Penalty.

Any person who drills, digs or constructs any works for the securing of underground water without having obtained a permit is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished under W.S.

41-3-616

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 41-147; Laws 1969, ch. 213, § 8; 1979, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to exemptions for use of water for domestic and stock use, see §

41-3-907

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “W.S.

41-3-616

” for “W.S.

41-3-614

.”